Maine, session 132, LD1620.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 28-B MRSA §601, as amended by PL 2023, c. 679, Pt. B, §112, is further
amended to read:
§601. Testing program established
The office shall establish a testing program for adult use cannabis and adult use
cannabis products. Except as otherwise provided in this subchapter, the program must
require a licensee, prior to selling or distributing adult use cannabis or an adult use cannabis
product to a consumer, to submit the cannabis or cannabis product to a testing facility for
testing to ensure that the cannabis or cannabis product does not exceed the maximum level
of allowable contamination for any contaminant that is injurious to health and for which
testing is required and to ensure correct labeling. The office shall adopt rules establishing
a testing program pursuant to this section, rules identifying the types of contaminants that
are injurious to health for which cannabis and cannabis products must be tested under this
subchapter and rules regarding the maximum level of allowable contamination for each
contaminant. The rules must establish a testing limit for total yeast and mold contamination
in adult use cannabis and adult use cannabis products of 100,000 colony-forming units per
gram and may require other microbial testing only for microbes injurious to health, as
determined by the office, including, but not limited to, Escherichia coli, salmonella and
coliform bacteria. Rules adopted pursuant to this subchapter are routine technical rules as
defined in Title 5, chapter 375, subchapter 2‑A.
Sec. 2. 28-B MRSA §602-A is enacted to read:
§602-A. Audit testing
This section establishes a process by which a licensee may be eligible for audit testing
of the licensee's adult use cannabis and adult use cannabis products.
1. Eligibility criteria. A licensee is eligible for audit testing under this section of the
licensee's adult use cannabis or adult use cannabis products if:
A. The licensee conducts 10 consecutive and separate mandatory tests of different
batches of the licensee's cannabis or cannabis products pursuant to section 602; and
B. The results of each of the tests under paragraph A demonstrate that the cannabis or
cannabis products in each batch do not exceed the maximum level of allowable
contamination for any contaminant that is injurious to health and for which testing is
required.
2. Eligibility determination. If a licensee believes the licensee is eligible for audit
testing based on the criteria under subsection 1, the licensee shall submit to the office a
request for a determination that the licensee is eligible for audit testing as well as the results
of the testing on which the request is based.
A. Upon receipt of the request and testing results, the office shall verify eligibility for
audit testing and notify the licensee in writing as to whether the licensee is eligible.
B. Notwithstanding section 602, and except as provided in subsection 3, a licensee
determined to be eligible for audit testing pursuant to this subsection is not required to
test the licensee's adult use cannabis or adult use cannabis products prior to sale or
distribution to a consumer.
Page 1 - 132LR1606(01)

3. Audit testing program; effect of exceedance. The office shall establish a program
for conducting audit testing of adult use cannabis and adult use cannabis products of
licensees determined eligible for audit testing under this section. If audit testing of any
batch of cannabis or cannabis products of such a licensee indicates an exceedance of the
maximum level of allowable contamination for any contaminant that is injurious to health
and for which testing is required, the licensee:
A. Must resume mandatory testing of the licensee's cannabis or cannabis products
pursuant to section 602; and
B. May subsequently be determined eligible for audit testing in accordance with this
section based on the results of additional mandatory testing.
4. Rulemaking. The office may adopt rules to implement this section. Rules adopted
pursuant to this subsection are routine technical rules as defined in Title 5, chapter 375,
subchapter 2-A.
Sec. 3. 28-B MRSA §603, as amended by PL 2023, c. 679, Pt. B, §118, is further
amended to read:
§603. Notification requirements Submission and publication of testing results
1. Notification Submission of testing results required. A testing facility that
conducts a mandatory test pursuant to section 602 shall submit the testing results to the
office within 30 days of completing the test. If the results of a mandatory test conducted
pursuant to section 602 indicate that the tested adult use cannabis or adult use cannabis
product exceeds the maximum level of allowable contamination for any contaminant that
is injurious to health and for which testing is required, the testing facility immediately shall
quarantine, document and properly destroy the cannabis or cannabis product, except when
the owner of the tested cannabis or cannabis product has successfully undertaken
remediation and retesting, and within 30 days of completing the test shall notify the office
of the test results.
1-A. Notification Submission of retesting results required. If a licensee chooses to
retest any cannabis or cannabis product for potency in accordance with section 503,
subsection 4‑A, the testing facility shall provide to the office and the licensee with the
results of the initial test for potency as well as the results of the retest for potency and shall
submit the results of each test to the office within 30 days of test completion.
1-B. Publication of testing results. In accordance with this subsection, the office
shall make available on its publicly accessible website all testing results submitted to the
office pursuant to this section.
A. The publicly accessible testing results must be anonymized so that the licensee for
which the test was conducted is indicated only through a unique identifying number or
other anonymous indicator assigned by the office.
B. The office shall ensure that submitted testing results are made available on its
publicly accessible website on a quarterly basis and no earlier than 3 months after the
date on which the testing was completed.
2. Notification Submission of testing results not required. A testing facility is not
required to notify submit to the office of the results of any test:
Page 2 - 132LR1606(01)

A. Conducted on adult use cannabis or an adult use cannabis product at the direction
of a licensee pursuant to section 602 that demonstrates that the cannabis or cannabis
product does not exceed the maximum level of allowable contamination for any
contaminant that is injurious to health and for which testing is required;
B. Conducted on adult use cannabis or an adult use cannabis product at the direction
of a licensee for research and development purposes only, so long as the licensee
notifies the testing facility prior to the performance of the test that the testing is for
research and development purposes only;
C. Conducted on cannabis or a cannabis product at the direction of a person who is not
a licensee; or
D. Conducted on a substance that is not cannabis or a cannabis product.